Maryland, session 2025, HB0037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Declaration of Rights
ARTICLE 49.
THAT EVERY PERSON EMPLOYED IN THE STATE HAS THE FUNDAMENTAL
RIGHT TO ORGANIZE AND BARGAIN COLLECTIVELY CONCERNING COMPENSATION,
HOURS, AND OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT. THE STATE MAY
NOT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, DENY, BURDEN, OR ABRIDGE THE RIGHT UNLESS
JUSTIFIED BY A COMPELLING STATE INTEREST ACHIEVED BY THE LEAST
RESTRICTIVE MEANS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0037*

HOUSE BILL 37
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.